California statutes. Public Contract Code
(vi) Any bankruptcy or receivership of any member of the design-build team, including, but not limited to, information concerning any work completed by a surety.

(vii) Any adverse
 claims, disputes, or lawsuits between the owner of a public works project and any member of the design-build team during the five years preceding submission of a bid under this article, in which the claim, settlement, or judgment exceeded fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) and was settled or otherwise resolved against the design-build entity or any member of the design-build team. Information shall also be provided concerning any work completed by a surety during this five-year period.

(viii) Any adverse claims, disputes, or lawsuits between any member of the design-build team and any employee of that entity during the five years preceding submission of a bid under this article, in which the claim, settlement, or judgment exceeded fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) and was settled or otherwise resolved against the entity.

(5) The information provided by a design-build entity in
 response to a request for qualifications shall be certified under penalty of perjury by the design-build entity and its general partners or joint venture members.

(c) (1) Following the deadline for submission of a statement of qualifications, the department shall review the submissions. The department may evaluate submissions based solely upon the information provided in each design-build entity’s statement of qualifications. The department may also interview some or all of the design-build entities to further evaluate their qualifications for the design-build project. The department may also hold discussions or negotiations with design-build entities using the process described in the department’s request for qualifications.

(2) For each request for qualifications, the department shall generate a final list of qualified design-build entities that
 participated in the request for qualifications before entering into negotiations for the contract or contracts to which the request for qualifications applies.

(3) If submissions in response to a request for qualifications provide sufficient information to determine which qualified design-build entity has offered the best value to the public, the department may enter into negotiations with that entity concerning contract terms and award a contract for design and preconstruction services to that entity. Such contract shall provide for the subsequent negotiation of terms governing the construction phase of the design-build project. If the department is unable to negotiate a satisfactory contract with that entity for design and preconstruction services, the department may undertake negotiations with a separate qualified design-build entity that participated in the request for qualifications process.

(4) If additional information is necessary to determine which qualified design-build entity offers the best value to the public, the department may prepare a further request for proposals, based on the documents prepared as described in subdivision (a), that invites qualified design-build entities identified pursuant to paragraph (2) to submit competitive sealed proposals in the manner prescribed by the department.

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of this code, upon issuance of a contract award, the director shall publicly announce its award, identifying the design-build entity to which the award is made, along with a statement regarding the basis of the award. The statement regarding the contract award and the contract file shall provide sufficient information to satisfy an external audit.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 58, Sec. 3.   (SB 146)   Effective July 10, 2023.   Repealed as of December 31, 2033, pursuant to Section 10215.8.)
-------------------------------------------

10215.3.

(a) The design-build entity shall provide payment and performance bonds for the design-build project in the form and in the amount required by the director, which are issued by a California admitted surety. The amount of the payment bond shall not be less than the amount of the performance bond.

(b) The design-build contract shall require errors and omissions insurance coverage for the design elements of the design-build project.

(c) The department shall develop a standard form of payment and performance bond for its design-build projects.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 58, Sec. 3.   (SB 146)   Effective July 10, 2023.   Repealed as of December 31, 2033, pursuant to Section 10215.8.)
-------------------------------------------

10215.4.

(a) After selecting a design-build entity for the design and preconstruction phase, the department may enter into a contract and direct the design-build entity to begin design and preconstruction activities sufficient to establish a guaranteed maximum price for the project.

(b) Subject to Section 13332.19 of the Government Code, if otherwise applicable to the department, upon agreement of the guaranteed maximum price for the design-build project, the department, at its sole and absolute discretion, may amend its contract with the design-build entity, or enter into a new contract, and direct the entity to complete the remaining design, preconstruction, and construction activities sufficient to complete and close out the design-build
 project, and may add funds not exceeding the guaranteed maximum price to the contract for these activities. Any amendment of the existing contract or a new contract with the design-build entity shall not require any additional competitive process. This section does not require the department to amend an existing contract or enter into a new contract for remaining design, preconstruction, or construction activities.

(c) If the cost for completing all remaining design, preconstruction, and construction activities sufficient to complete and close out the design-build project exceeds the guaranteed maximum price, the costs exceeding the guaranteed maximum price shall be the responsibility of the design-build entity. If the cost for these activities is less than the guaranteed maximum price, the design-build entity shall not be entitled to the difference between the cost and the guaranteed maximum price. Any savings provided to the department shall
 revert to the fund from which the appropriation was made.

(d) If the department and the design-build entity do not reach an agreement on a guaranteed maximum price or the department otherwise elects not to have the design-build entity complete some or all of the remaining work, the department may solicit proposals to complete some or all of the remaining work from firms that submitted a statement of qualifications pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 10215.2. The department may also, upon written determination that it is in the best interest of the state to do so, formally solicit proposals from other entities to complete all or some of the remaining work, or complete the design-build project using other delivery methods. Subject to Section 13332.19 of the Government Code, if otherwise applicable to the department, any contract awarded shall be made on a best value basis.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 58, Sec. 3.   (SB 146)   Effective July 10, 2023.   Repealed as of December 31, 2033, pursuant to Section 10215.8.)
-------------------------------------------

10215.5.

(a) The department, in each request for qualifications or request for proposals, may identify specific types of subcontractors that are required to be included in the design-build entity’s statement of qualifications. All construction subcontractors that are identified in the statement of qualifications shall be afforded all the protections of Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 4100) of Part 1.

(b) Following award of the design-build contract, except for those construction subcontractors listed in the statement of qualifications or proposal, the design-build entity shall proceed as follows in awarding construction subcontracts with a value exceeding one-half of 1 percent of the contract price allocable to construction work:

(1) Provide public notice of availability of work to be subcontracted in accordance with the publication requirements applicable to the competitive bidding process of the department, including a fixed date and time on which qualification statements, bids, or proposals will be due.

(2) Establish reasonable qualification criteria and standards.

(3) Award the subcontract either on a best value basis or to the lowest responsible bidder. The process may include prequalification or short-listing.

(c) Subcontractors awarded construction subcontracts under this subdivision shall be afforded all the protections of Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 4100) of Part 1.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 58, Sec. 3.   (SB 146)   Effective July 10, 2023.   Repealed as of December 31, 2033, pursuant to Section 10215.8.)
-------------------------------------------

10215.6.

(a) Any department authorized by Section 10215.1 to utilize progressive design-build contracts pursuant to this article shall prepare and submit to the Legislature a report by January 1, 2034, that describes each design-build project awarded under this article that has begun construction by January 1, 2033.

(b) The report described in subdivision (a) shall include relevant data including, but not limited to, all of the following information:

(1) The cost of the design-build project.

(2) The current status or stage of the design-build project.

(3) If complete, the completion date of the design-build project.

(4) If incomplete, the estimated completion date of the design-build project.

(c) The report described in subdivision (a) shall also provide a comprehensive assessment on the effectiveness of the progressive design-build project delivery method relative to project cost and time savings.

(d) The report submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 58, Sec. 3.   (SB 146)   Effective July 10, 2023.   Repealed as of December 31, 2033, pursuant to Section 10215.8.)
-------------------------------------------

10215.7.

This article does not affect, expand, alter, or limit any rights or remedies otherwise available at law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 58, Sec. 3.   (SB 146)   Effective July 10, 2023.   Repealed as of December 31, 2033, pursuant to Section 10215.8.)
-------------------------------------------

10215.8.

This article shall remain in effect only until December 31, 2033, and as of that date is repealed. The repeal of this article shall not affect the contracts entered into by the department, or the department’s authority to complete the design-build projects for which a design and preconstruction phase contract has been entered under this article, before December 31, 2033.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 58, Sec. 3.   (SB 146)   Effective July 10, 2023.   Repealed as of December 31, 2033, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Article 6.7, commencing with Section 10215.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Contract Requirements [10220. - 10232.]

10220.

Every contract awarded under this part shall be submitted to the Attorney General or the attorney appointed according to law and authorized to represent the department under which it is to be performed. Such a contract is not binding on the state until the appropriate attorney finds it to be in accordance with the requirements of this chapter, and endorses such finding thereon.

A certified copy of each contract shall be filed with the Controller, but the failure so to file does not invalidate it.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1981, Ch. 306.)
-------------------------------------------

10221.

Every contract shall provide for the filing of separate performance and payment bonds by the contractor in the form of bonds executed by an admitted surety insurer and not deposits in lieu of bond, subject to the approval of the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 517, Sec. 348.4.)
-------------------------------------------

10222.

(a) Each bond shall equal at least one-half of the contract price, except as otherwise provided in
 Section 9554 of the Civil Code, in the California Toll Bridge Authority Act (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 30000) of Division 7 of the Streets and Highways Code), or in subdivision (b).

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), for projects with a contract price greater than two hundred fifty million dollars ($250,000,000), the Department of Transportation shall have the discretion to specify that the payment bond shall equal not less than one-half of the contract price or five hundred million dollars ($500,000,000), whichever is less.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 45.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697.)
-------------------------------------------

10223.

The payment bond shall secure the payment of the claims of laborers, mechanics or materialmen employed on the work under the contract and shall contain all other provisions required by law.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1981, Ch. 306.)
-------------------------------------------

10224.

The performance bond shall guarantee the faithful performance of the contract by the contractor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1981, Ch. 306.)
-------------------------------------------

10225.

No payment shall be made upon the contract to the contractor or any assignee of the contractor until any order by the director that a sufficient surety be substituted on the bond or that a new, additional, or supplemental bond be given, is satisfied. No cancellation of or withdrawal of a surety from a bond is effective unless approved by the director.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 517, Sec. 348.5.)
-------------------------------------------

10226.

Every contract shall contain a provision in regard to the time when the whole or any specified portion of the work contemplated shall be completed, and shall provide that for each day completion is delayed beyond the specified time, the contractor shall forfeit and pay to the state a specified sum of money, to be deducted from any payments due or to become due to the contractor. The sum so specified is valid as liquidated damages unless manifestly unreasonable under the circumstances existing at the time the contract was made. A contract for a road project, flood control project, or project involving facilities of the State
 Water Resources Development System may also provide for the payment of extra compensation to the contractor, as a bonus for completion prior to the specified time, the provision, if used, to be included in the specifications and to clearly set forth the basis for the payment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1044, Sec. 1.5.   Effective September 19, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

10227.

Every contract shall provide that the department may make changes in the plans and specifications pursuant to this part.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1981, Ch. 306.)
-------------------------------------------

10230.

Every contract subject to this part, for which disabled veteran business enterprise participation is included in the bid, shall contain a provision requiring the contractor to comply with rules, regulations, ordinances, and statutes that apply to the California Disabled Veteran Business Enterprise Program as defined in Section 999 of the Military and Veterans Code, including, but not limited to, the requirements of subdivision (d) of Section 999.5 of the Military and Veterans Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 676, Sec. 5.   (AB 230)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

10231.

Every contract subject to this part shall contain a provision requiring each contractor to comply with all air pollution control rules, regulations, ordinances, and statutes which apply to any work performed pursuant to the contract, including any air pollution control rules, regulations, ordinances, and statutes specified in Section 11017 of the Government Code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1981, Ch. 306.)
-------------------------------------------

10232.

Every contract shall contain a statement by which the contractor swears under penalty of perjury that no more than one final, unappealable finding of contempt of court by a federal court has been issued against the contractor within the immediately preceding two-year period because of the contractor’s failure to comply with an order of a federal court which orders the contractor to comply with an order of the National Labor Relations Board. For purposes of this section, a finding of contempt does not include any finding which has been vacated, dismissed, or otherwise removed by the court because the contractor has complied with the order which was the
 basis for the finding. The state may rescind any contract in which the contractor falsely swears to the truth of the statement required by this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 89.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7.1. Resolution of Contract Claims [10240. - 10240.13.]

10240.

The remedy for the resolution of claims arising under contracts made under the provisions of this chapter shall be arbitration pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

10240.1.

The claimant may initiate arbitration not later than 90 days after the date of service in person or by mail on the claimant of the final written decision by the department on the claim. This limitation shall not apply to any claim founded on any cost audit, latent defect, warranty, or guarantee under the contract.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 857, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

10240.2.

A failure by the claimant to pursue diligently and exhaust, as to the claim, the required administrative procedures set forth in the contract under which the claim arose shall be a bar to arbitration hereunder until there has been compliance therewith. Subject to the preceding sentence, if more than 240 days have elapsed since acceptance of the work by the department, the claimant is entitled to arbitration, even though the procedures are not concluded.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

10240.3.

Unless otherwise agreed by the parties, the arbitration shall be conducted by a single arbitrator selected by the parties from the certified list created by the Public Works Contract Arbitration Committee. If the parties cannot agree on the arbitrator, either party may petition the superior court to appoint one from the panel of arbitrators certified by the Public Works Contract Arbitration Committee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

10240.4.

No decision made by a department shall be conclusive on any issue in the arbitration.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

10240.5.

(a) The Departments of General Services, Transportation, and Water Resources shall jointly adopt and may, from time to time, modify, revise, or repeal uniform regulations to implement this article, which regulations shall be consistent with this article and Article 7.2 (commencing with Section 10245). The regulations may include, but need not be limited to:

(1) The method of initiating arbitration.

(2) The
 place of hearing based upon the convenience of the parties.

(3) Procedures for the selection of a neutral arbitrator.

(4) The form and content of any pleading.

(5) Procedure for conducting hearings.

(6) The providing of experts to assist the arbitrator in the event the assistance is needed.

(7) The content of the award.

(8) Simplified procedures for claims of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) or less.

(b) Pending adoption of the initial uniform regulations under this section, the arbitration rules set forth in Subchapter 3 (commencing with Section 301) of Chapter
 2 of Title 1 of the California Code of Regulations, shall govern the conduct of arbitrations under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 536.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

10240.6.

As used in this article, “claim” means a demand for monetary compensation or damages, arising under or relating to the performance of a contract awarded under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

10240.7.

As used in this article, “Public Works Contract Arbitration Committee” means the committee created by Article 7.2 (commencing with Section 10245).

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

10240.8.

Unless the parties to the contract otherwise agree, the arbitration decision shall be decided under and in accordance with the law of this state, supported by substantial evidence and, in writing, contain the basis for the decision, findings of fact, and conclusions of law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

10240.9.

A party to the contract may join in the arbitration as a party, any supplier, subcontractor, design professional, surety, or other person who has so agreed and if the joinder is necessary to prevent a substantial risk of the party otherwise being subjected to inconsistent obligations or decisions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

10240.10.

Nothing in this article shall be construed as preventing the parties to the contract, after the claim has arisen, from mutually agreeing in writing to waive the provisions of this article and to have the claim litigated in a court of competent jurisdiction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

10240.11.

Except as provided in this article and in the regulations adopted pursuant to Section 10240.5, the procedure governing the arbitrations shall be as set forth in Title 9 (commencing with Section 1280) of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure. All provisions of Section 1283.05 of the Code of Civil Procedure, except subdivision (e) thereof, apply to the conduct of discovery for any arbitration hereunder.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

10240.12.

A party may, within the applicable time periods and upon the grounds specified in this section and in Article 1 (commencing with Section 1285) of Chapter 4 of Title 9 of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure, petition the court to confirm, correct, or vacate the award rendered by the arbitrator. However, no department may petition to vacate an award without the prior written authorization of its agency secretary. Except where the parties agree not to have the arbitration decision rendered in accordance with the provisions of Section 10240.8, a court shall vacate the award, or part thereof, if it determines either that the award, or part thereof, is not
 supported by substantial evidence or that it is not decided under or in accordance with the laws of this state. If the award, or part thereof, is vacated on the grounds set forth in the preceding sentence or in subdivision (d) or (e) of Section 1286.2 of the Code of Civil Procedure or if the court determines that the award does not include a determination of all submitted questions necessary to determine the controversy, the court may order a rehearing before the original arbitrator or remand to the original arbitrator that portion of the dispute which the court concludes the arbitrator failed to determine.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

10240.13.

The cost of conducting the arbitration shall be borne equally by the parties. The filing fee, witness fees, costs of discovery, or any other cost necessarily incurred by one party shall not be shared by any other party, except that the arbitrator may allow the prevailing party to recover its costs and necessary disbursements, other than attorney’s fees, on the same basis as is allowed in civil actions. These costs shall be taxed as in civil actions.

Interest may be recovered as part of the award as in a civil action. The arbitrator has the same authority as a court in awarding interest and the commencement of
 the arbitration is equivalent to the filing of an action under subdivision (b) of Section 3287 of the Civil Code for the purpose of an award of interest. 

If a party has made an offer of settlement and the award is less favorable than the offer, then the party who has received the offer shall not recover any interest accruing from and after the date on which the offer was made, nor costs of suit.

Reasonable attorney fees may be recovered according to any of the following:

(a) By a party who has made an offer under the circumstances set forth in the preceding sentence but only as to those fees incurred from and after the time of making the offer.

(b) Against a party when substantial evidence establishes that the party has acted frivolously or in bad faith in its demand for, or participation in,
 the arbitration.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 90.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7.2. Public Works Contract Arbitration Committee [10245. - 10245.4.]

10245.

There is hereby established the Public Works Contract Arbitration Committee, which shall consist of seven members, as follows:

(a) Three public members, who shall be appointed by the Governor, each of whom shall have at least ten years’ experience with a general contracting firm engaged, during that period, in public works construction in California.

(b) The directors of the Departments of General Services, Transportation, and Water Resources shall each appoint a member, who shall be a state officer or employee within their
 respective departments. Each member shall serve at the pleasure of the director who appointed the member.

(c) The Director of the Office of Administrative Hearings shall be a nonvoting member of the Public Works Contract Arbitration Committee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 91.)
-------------------------------------------

10245.1.

Each member appointed by the Governor shall serve for a term of four years, but shall continue in office until the successor to the member is appointed. Each member shall serve without compensation, but shall be reimbursed for travel and other expenses necessarily incurred in the performance of the member’s duties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 91.)
-------------------------------------------

10245.2.

The committee may make recommendations to the departments respecting the arbitration practice and procedure provided by Article 7.1 (commencing with Section 10240). The departments shall consult and confer with the committee respecting the content of the uniform regulations governing the conduct of arbitrations under Article 7.1 (commencing with Section 10240) and shall consider the recommendations in adopting uniform regulations pursuant to Section 10240.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 91.)
-------------------------------------------

10245.3.

The committee may establish standards and qualifications for the certification of arbitrators and certify as arbitrators persons meeting such standards and qualifications. The committee may remove persons from its list of certified arbitrators.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 91.)
-------------------------------------------

10245.4.

The Office of Administrative Hearings shall provide administrative services, facilities, and fiscal support to implement this article and Article 7.1 (commencing with Section 10240). The cost thereof shall be recovered through filing fees imposed for each arbitration.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 91.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Modifications; Performance; Payment [10250. - 10265.]

10250.

The department may increase or decrease quantities of work to be done under a unit basis contract during the progress of the work.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1981, Ch. 306.)
-------------------------------------------

10251.

The department may cause the insertion of provisions in any contract for the performance of such extra work and the furnishing of materials therefor by the contractor as the department requires for the proper completion or construction of the whole work contemplated, if the bidders have equal opportunity of knowing the proposed terms for the extra work.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1981, Ch. 306.)
-------------------------------------------

10252.

The director may grant such extensions of time for completion as he deems for the best interests of the state.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1981, Ch. 306.)
-------------------------------------------

10253.

If the director deems that a contractor has failed to supply an adequate working force, or material of proper quality, or has failed to comply with Section 10262, or has failed in any other respect to prosecute the work with the diligence and force specified by the contract, the director may:

(a) After written notice of at least five days to the contractor, specifying the defaults to be remedied, provide any such labor or materials and deduct the cost from any money due or to become due to the contractor under the contract; or 

(b) If he
 considers that the failure is sufficient ground for such action, he may give written notice of at least five days to the contractor and the contractor’s sureties, that if the defaults are not remedied the contractor’s control over the work will be terminated.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1981, Ch. 306.)
-------------------------------------------

10254.

If the defaults are not remedied within the time specified in the notice, the contractor’s control shall terminate as of the expiration of that time.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1981, Ch. 306.)
-------------------------------------------

10255.

Upon such termination, the director may take possession of and use all or any part of the contractor’s materials, tools, equipment, and appliances upon the premises to complete the contract. Thereupon, he may permit the surety to complete or cause the contract work to be completed, or he may direct that all or any part of the work be completed by day’s labor or by employment of other contractors on informal contracts, or both.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1981, Ch. 306.)
-------------------------------------------

10256.

Such informal contracts may be awarded only after a proposal form has been prepared, a copy is served upon the contractor whose control has been terminated, and upon his surety, and three days allowed thereafter so that he may cause others to bid. Any person who is prequalified therefor under Article 4 may bid on informal contracts.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1981, Ch. 306.)
-------------------------------------------

10257.

The provisions of this part, except as to prequalification, are not applicable to the award of informal contracts.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1981, Ch. 306.)
-------------------------------------------

10258.

If the control of a contractor is terminated or he abandons the work, and the work is performed by day’s labor or informal contract as provided in Section 10255, he is not entitled to receive any portion of the amount to be paid under the contract until it is fully completed. After completion, if the unpaid balance exceeds the sum of the amount expended by the state in finishing the work, plus all damages sustained or to be sustained by the state, the excess not otherwise required by law to be retained shall be paid to the contractor, but if such sum exceeds the unpaid balance, the contractor and his surety are liable to the state for the excess. If the surety completes the
 contract work, as provided in Section 10255, such surety shall be subrogated to money due under the contract and to money which shall become due in the course of completion by the surety, to the extent provided by law.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1981, Ch. 306.)
-------------------------------------------

10259.

On the completion of the contract, the original contractor is entitled to the return of all his unused materials, and his equipment, tools, and appliances, except that he shall have no claim on account of usual and ordinary depreciation, loss, and wear and tear.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1981, Ch. 306.)
-------------------------------------------

10260.

The notices required by this article may be served on the contractor or on his agent having charge of the work, personally, or by registered mail addressed to the contractor or his agent, or, if neither can be located or their addresses are unknown, by posting in a conspicuous place upon the premises of the project.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1981, Ch. 306.)
-------------------------------------------

10261.

(a) Payments upon contracts shall be made as the department prescribes upon estimates made and approved by the department, but progress payments shall not be made in excess of 100 percent of the percentage of actual work completed plus a like percentage of the value of material delivered on the ground or stored subject to or under the control of the state, and unused, except as otherwise provided in this section. The department shall withhold not more than 5 percent of the contract price until final completion and acceptance of the project. However, at any time after 95 percent of the work has been completed, the department may reduce the funds withheld to an amount not less than 125 percent of the estimated value of the work yet to be completed, as determined by the department, if the reduction has been approved, in writing, by
 the surety on the performance bond and by the surety on the payment bond. The Controller shall draw their warrants upon estimates so made and approved by the department and the Treasurer shall pay them. The funds may be released by electronic transfer if that procedure is requested by the contractor, in writing, and if the department has, in place at the time of the request, the mechanism for the transfer.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), when the director of the department has made a finding prior to the bid that a specified project is substantially complex and therefore requires a higher retention amount than 5 percent, and the department includes in the bid documents details explaining the basis for the finding
 and the actual retention amount, then payments upon contracts by the department shall be made as the department prescribes upon estimates made and approved by the department. However, progress payments shall not be made in excess of 95 percent of the percentage of actual work completed, plus a like percentage of the value of material delivered on the ground or stored, subject to, or under the control of the state, and unused, except as otherwise provided in this section. At any time after 95 percent of the work has been completed, the department may reduce the funds withheld to an amount not less than 125 percent of the estimated value of the work yet to be completed, as determined by the department, if the reduction has been approved, in writing, by the surety on the performance bond and by the surety on the payment bond. The Controller shall draw
 their warrants upon estimates so made and approved by the department and the Treasurer shall pay them with funds appropriated therefor. The funds may be released by electronic transfer if that procedure is requested by the contractor, in writing, and if the department has, in place at the time of the request, the mechanism for the transfer.

(2) Any finding by the director of a department that a project is substantially complex shall include a description of the specific project and why it is a unique project that is not regularly, customarily, or routinely performed by the agency or licensed contractors.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 37, Sec. 2) by Stats. 2022, Ch. 121, Sec. 2.   (AB 2173)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

10261.5.

(a) Any state agency which fails to make any progress payment within 30 days after receipt of the payment request from a contractor on a construction contract for an undisputed payment request, which was properly submitted by the contractor to the agency, shall pay interest to the contractor equivalent to the legal rate set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 685.010 of the Code of Civil Procedure. Any state agency which independently calculates the amount due on a progress payment and which fails to make a progress payment within 30 days of the first submittal of the estimate for each contract by the engineer, shall pay interest to
 the contractor equivalent to the legal rate set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 685.010 of the Code of Civil Procedure. In the event that the payment is not made within 30 days of receipt of the contractor’s request or the first submittal by the engineer, and the Controller has processed the payment within 14 days of receipt of the request or submittal, the contracting state agency shall pay interest to the contractor equivalent to the legal rate set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 685.010 of the Code of Civil Procedure. In the event that the payment is not made within 30 days of receipt of the contractor’s request or the first submittal by the engineer, and the contracting state agency has processed the payment within 16 days after receipt of the request or submittal, the Controller shall pay interest as provided in Section 685.010 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

For purposes of this section, a payment request shall be considered properly executed if funds
 are available for payment of the payment request, and payment is not delayed due to an audit inquiry by the Controller.

(b) Upon receipt of a payment request, each agency shall require:

(1) That each payment request be reviewed as soon as practicable after receipt for the purpose of determining that a payment request is a proper payment request.

(2) Any payment request determined not to be a proper payment request suitable for payment shall be returned as soon as practicable, but not later than seven days, after receipt, specifying the reasons that the payment request is not a proper payment request.

(3) The number of days available to a state agency to make a timely payment of payment request without incurring interest shall be reduced by the number of
 days by which an agency exceeds the requirements of paragraph (2).

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1253, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

10261.7.

(a) Within 10 days of making a construction contract payment, a state agency that maintains an Internet Web site shall post on its Internet Web site the following:

(1) The project for which the payment was made.

(2) The name of the construction contractor or company paid.

(3) The date the payment was
 made or the date the state agency transmitted instructions to the Controller or other payer to make the payment.

(4) The payment application number or other identifying information.

(5) The amount of the payment.

(b) This section shall not apply to a construction contract valued below twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).
